Mississippi, session 2026, HB4153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Sandra L. Warner of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Possession Stolen Property in Rankin County.  On October 16, 2013, she was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released on probation November 3, 2014.  She was discharged from probation on September 30, 2016. The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.